Texas statutes.
CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

TITLE 1. CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

Text of chapter effective until January 1, 2025

CHAPTER 13. VENUE

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.01. OFFENSES COMMITTED OUTSIDE THIS STATE. Offenses committed wholly or in part outside this State, under circumstances that give this State jurisdiction to prosecute the offender, may be prosecuted in any county in which the offender is found or in any county in which an element of the offense occurs.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 976, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.02. FORGERY. Forgery may be prosecuted in any county where the writing was forged, or where the same was used or passed, or attempted to be used or passed, or deposited or placed with another person, firm, association, or corporation either for collection or credit for the account of any person, firm, association or corporation. In addition, a forging and uttering, using or passing of forged instruments in writing which concern or affect the title to land in this State may be prosecuted in the county in which such land, or any part thereof, is situated.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 976, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.03. PERJURY. Perjury and aggravated perjury may be prosecuted in the county where committed, or in the county where the false statement is used or attempted to be used.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 976, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.04. ON THE BOUNDARIES OF COUNTIES. An offense committed on the boundaries of two or more counties, or within four hundred yards thereof, may be prosecuted and punished in any one of such counties and any offense committed on the premises of any airport operated jointly by two municipalities and situated in two counties may be prosecuted and punished in either county.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 977, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974; Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1251, ch. 454, art. 2, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2239, ch. 534, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.045. ON THE BOUNDARIES OF CERTAIN MUNICIPALITIES. An offense punishable by fine only that is committed on or near the boundary of contiguous municipalities that have entered into an agreement authorized by Article 4.14(f) and Section 29.003(h), Government Code, may be prosecuted in either of those municipalities as provided in the agreement.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 230 (S.B. 1504), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1004 (H.B. 1264), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.05. CRIMINAL HOMICIDE COMMITTED OUTSIDE THIS STATE. The offense of criminal homicide committed wholly or in part outside this State, under circumstances that give this State jurisdiction to prosecute the offender, may be prosecuted in the county where the injury was inflicted, or in the county where the offender was located when he inflicted the injury, or in the county where the victim died or the body was found.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 977, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.06. COMMITTED ON A BOUNDARY STREAM. If an offense be committed upon any river or stream, the boundary of this State, it may be prosecuted in the county the boundary of which is upon such stream or river, and the county seat of which is nearest the place where the offense was committed.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 977, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.07. INJURED IN ONE COUNTY AND DYING IN ANOTHER. If a person receives an injury in one county and dies in another by reason of such injury, the offender may be prosecuted in the county where the injury was received or where the death occurred, or in the county where the dead body is found.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 977, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.072. CONTINUOUS VIOLENCE AGAINST THE FAMILY COMMITTED IN MORE THAN ONE COUNTY. An offense under Section 25.11, Penal Code, may be prosecuted in any county in which the defendant engaged in the conduct constituting an offense under Section 22.01(a)(1), Penal Code, against a person described by Section 25.11(a), Penal Code.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1360 (H.B. 1661), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.075. CHILD INJURED IN ONE COUNTY AND RESIDING IN ANOTHER. An offense under Title 5, Penal Code, involving a victim younger than 18 years of age, or an offense under Section 25.03, Penal Code, that results in bodily injury to a child younger than 18 years of age, may be prosecuted in the county:

(1) in which an element of the offense was committed;

(2) in which the defendant is apprehended;

(3) in which the victim resides; or

(4) in which the defendant resides.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1100 (S.B. 1551), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.08. THEFT; ORGANIZED RETAIL THEFT; CARGO THEFT. (a) Where property is stolen in one county and removed to another county, the offender may be prosecuted either in the county in which the property was stolen or in any other county through or into which the property was removed.

(b) An offense under Section 31.16 or 31.18, Penal Code, may be prosecuted in any county in which an underlying theft could have been prosecuted as a separate offense.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 977, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1274 (H.B. 3584), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 433 (S.B. 1103), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1219 (S.B. 1828), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1219 (S.B. 1828), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.09. HINDERING SECURED CREDITORS. If secured property is taken from one county and unlawfully disposed of in another county or state, the offender may be prosecuted either in the county in which such property was disposed of, or in the county from which it was removed, or in the county in which the security agreement is filed.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 976, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.10. PERSONS ACTING UNDER AUTHORITY OF THIS STATE. An offense committed outside this State by any officer acting under the authority of this State, under circumstances that give this state jurisdiction to prosecute the offender, may be prosecuted in the county of his residence or, if a nonresident of this State, in Travis County.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 977, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.11. ON VESSELS. An offense committed on board a vessel which is at the time upon any navigable water within the boundaries of this State, may be prosecuted in any county through which the vessel is navigated in the course of her voyage, or in the county where the voyage commences or terminates.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 977, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.12. TRAFFICKING OF PERSONS, FALSE IMPRISONMENT, KIDNAPPING, AND SMUGGLING OF PERSONS. Venue for trafficking of persons, false imprisonment, kidnapping, and smuggling of persons is in:

(1) the county in which the offense was committed; or

(2) any county through, into, or out of which the person trafficked, falsely imprisoned, kidnapped, or transported may have been taken.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 977, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 24), Sec. 2.04, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 223 (H.B. 260), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Reenacted by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 3.004, eff. September 1, 2013.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.13. CONSPIRACY. Criminal conspiracy may be prosecuted in the county where the conspiracy was entered into, in the county where the conspiracy was agreed to be executed, or in any county in which one or more of the conspirators does any act to effect an object of the conspiracy. If the object of the conspiracy is an offense classified as a felony under the Tax Code, regardless of whether the offense was committed, the conspiracy may be prosecuted in any county in which venue is proper under the Tax Code for the offense. If a conspiracy was entered into outside this State under circumstances that give this State jurisdiction to prosecute the offender, the offender may be prosecuted in the county where the conspiracy was agreed to be executed, in the county where any one of the conspirators was found, or in Travis County.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 978, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 68 (S.B. 934), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.14. BIGAMY. Bigamy may be prosecuted:

(1) in the county where the bigamous marriage occurred;

(2) in any county in this State in which the parties to such bigamous marriage may live or cohabit together as man and wife; or

(3) in any county in this State in which a party to the bigamous marriage not charged with the offense resides.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 978, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1112, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.15. SEXUAL ASSAULT. Sexual assault may be prosecuted in the county in which it is committed, in the county in which the victim is abducted, or in any county through or into which the victim is transported in the course of the abduction and sexual assault. When it shall come to the knowledge of any district judge whose court has jurisdiction under this Article that sexual assault has probably been committed, he shall immediately, if his court be in session, and if not in session, then, at the first term thereafter in any county of the district, call the attention of the grand jury thereto; and if the court be in session, but the grand jury has been discharged, he shall immediately recall the grand jury to investigate the accusation. The district courts are authorized and directed to change the venue in such cases whenever it shall be necessary to secure a speedy trial.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 978, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974; Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 692, ch. 262, Sec. 1, eff. May 25, 1977.

Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2636, ch. 707, Sec. 4(17), eff. Aug. 31, 1981; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5317, ch. 977, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1983.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.16. CRIMINAL NONSUPPORT. Criminal nonsupport may be prosecuted in the county where the offended spouse or child is residing at the time the information or indictment is presented.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 978, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.17. PROOF OF VENUE. In all cases mentioned in this Chapter, the indictment or information, or any pleading in the case, may allege that the offense was committed in the county where the prosecution is carried on. To sustain the allegation of venue, it shall only be necessary to prove by the preponderance of the evidence that by reason of the facts in the case, the county where such prosecution is carried on has venue.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 978, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.18. OTHER OFFENSES. If venue is not specifically stated, the proper county for the prosecution of offenses is that in which the offense was committed.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 978, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan. 1, 1974.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.19. WHERE VENUE CANNOT BE DETERMINED. If an offense has been committed within the state and it cannot readily be determined within which county or counties the commission took place, trial may be held in the county in which the defendant resides, in the county in which he is apprehended, or in the county to which he is extradited.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 979, ch. 399, Sec. 2(C), eff. Jan., 1, 1974.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.20. VENUE BY CONSENT. The trial of all felony cases, without a jury, may, with the consent of the defendant in writing, his attorney, and the attorney for the state, be held in any county within the judicial district or districts for the county where venue is otherwise authorized by law.

Added by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 242, ch. 91, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.21. ORGANIZED CRIMINAL ACTIVITY. The offense of engaging in organized criminal activity may be prosecuted in any county in which any act is committed to effect an objective of the combination or, if the prosecution is based on a criminal offense classified as a felony under the Tax Code, in any county in which venue is proper under the Tax Code for the offense.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 924, ch. 346, Sec. 2, eff. June 10, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 68 (S.B. 934), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.22. POSSESSION AND DELIVERY OF MARIHUANA. An offense of possession or delivery of marihuana may be prosecuted in the county where the offense was committed or with the consent of the defendant in a county that is adjacent to and in the same judicial district as the county where the offense was committed.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 18, ch. 10, Sec. 1, eff. March 7, 1979.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.23. UNAUTHORIZED USE OF A VEHICLE. An offense of unauthorized use of a vehicle may be prosecuted in any county where the unauthorized use of the vehicle occurred or in the county in which the vehicle was originally reported stolen.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 719, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1985.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.24. ILLEGAL RECRUITMENT OF ATHLETES. An offense of illegal recruitment of an athlete may be prosecuted in any county in which the offense was committed or in the county in which is located the institution of higher education in which the athlete agreed to enroll or was influenced to enroll.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 125, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.25. COMPUTER CRIMES. (a) In this section "access," "computer," "computer network," "computer program," "computer system," and "owner" have the meanings assigned to those terms by Section 33.01, Penal Code.

(b) An offense under Chapter 33, Penal Code, may be prosecuted in:

(1) the county of the principal place of business of the owner or lessee of a computer, computer network, or computer system involved in the offense;

(2) any county in which a defendant had control or possession of:

(A) any proceeds of the offense; or

(B) any books, records, documents, property, negotiable instruments, computer programs, or other material used in furtherance of the offense;

(3) any county from which, to which, or through which access to a computer, computer network, computer program, or computer system was made in violation of Chapter 33, whether by wires, electromagnetic waves, microwaves, or any other means of communication; or

(4) any county in which an individual who is a victim of the offense resides.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 306, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from art. 13.24 by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 19.01(1), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Subsec. (a) amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 3.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1994; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 306, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 547 (S.B. 222), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.26. TELECOMMUNICATIONS CRIMES. An offense under Chapter 33A, Penal Code, may be prosecuted in the county in which the telecommunications service originated or terminated or in the county to which the bill for the telecommunications service was or would have been delivered.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 306, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.27. SIMULATING LEGAL PROCESS. An offense under Section 32.46, 32.48, 32.49, or 37.13, Penal Code, may be prosecuted either in the county from which any material document was sent or in the county in which it was delivered.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 189, Sec. 12, eff. May 21, 1997. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.C.C.P. art. 13.26 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(6), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.271. PROSECUTION OF MORTGAGE FRAUD. (a) In this article, "real estate transaction" means a sale, lease, trade, exchange, gift, grant, or other conveyance of a real property interest.

(b) Any offense under Chapter 32, Penal Code, that involves a real estate transaction may be prosecuted in:

(1) the county where the property is located; or

(2) any county in which part of the transaction occurred, including the generation of documentation supporting the transaction.

(c) An offense under Section 32.46, 32.48, or 32.49, Penal Code, that involves a real estate transaction may also be prosecuted in any county authorized by Article 13.27.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 389 (S.B. 485), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.28. ESCAPE; UNAUTHORIZED ABSENCE. An offense of escape under Section 38.06, Penal Code, or unauthorized absence under Section 38.113, Penal Code, may be prosecuted in:

(1) the county in which the offense of escape or unauthorized absence was committed; or

(2) the county in which the defendant committed the offense for which the defendant was placed in custody, detained, or required to submit to treatment.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 392, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.29. FRAUDULENT USE OR POSSESSION OF IDENTIFYING INFORMATION. An offense under Section 32.51, Penal Code, may be prosecuted in any county in which the offense was committed or in the county of residence for the person whose identifying information was fraudulently obtained, possessed, transferred, or used.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 415, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Renumbered from Code of Criminal Procedure, Art/Sec 13.28 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(7), eff. September 1, 2005.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.291. CREDIT CARD OR DEBIT CARD ABUSE. An offense under Section 32.31, Penal Code, may be prosecuted in any county in which the offense was committed or in the county of residence for any person whose credit card or debit card was unlawfully possessed or used by the defendant.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 291 (H.B. 2624), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.295. UNAUTHORIZED ACQUISITION OR TRANSFER OF CERTAIN FINANCIAL INFORMATION. An offense under Section 31.17, Penal Code, may be prosecuted in any county in which the offense was committed or in the county of residence of the person whose financial sight order or payment card information was unlawfully obtained or transferred.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 260 (H.B. 1215), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.30. FRAUDULENT, SUBSTANDARD, OR FICTITIOUS DEGREE. An offense under Section 32.52, Penal Code, may be prosecuted in the county in which an element of the offense occurs or in Travis County.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1039 (H.B. 1173), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2005.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.31. FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH SEX OFFENDER REGISTRATION STATUTE. An offense under Chapter 62 may be prosecuted in:

(1) any county in which an element of the offense occurs;

(2) the county in which the person subject to Chapter 62 last registered, verified registration, or otherwise complied with a requirement of Chapter 62;

(3) the county in which the person required to register under Chapter 62 has indicated that the person intends to reside, regardless of whether the person establishes or attempts to establish residency in that county;

(4) any county in which the person required to register under Chapter 62 is placed under custodial arrest for an offense subsequent to the person's most recent reportable conviction or adjudication under Chapter 62; or

(5) the county in which the person required to register under Chapter 62 resides or is found by a peace officer, regardless of how long the person has been in the county or intends to stay in the county.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1008 (H.B. 867), Sec. 1.02, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Code of Criminal Procedure, Art/Sec 13.30 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(8), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 661 (H.B. 2153), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Without reference to the amendment of this article, this chapter was repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Art. 13.315. FELONY OFFENSE COMMITTED BY CIVILLY COMMITTED SEXUALLY VIOLENT PREDATOR. A felony offense committed by a person civilly committed under Chapter 841, Health and Safety Code, may be prosecuted in the county in which any element of the offense occurs or in the court that retains jurisdiction over the civil commitment proceeding under Section 841.082, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1219 (H.B. 2034), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 351 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2023.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.32. MISAPPLICATION OF CERTAIN PROPERTY. (a) An offender who misapplies property held as a fiduciary or property of a financial institution in one county and removes the property to another county may be prosecuted in the county where the offender misapplied the property, in any other county through or into which the offender removed the property, or, as applicable, in the county in which the fiduciary was appointed to serve.

(b) An offense related to misapplication of construction trust funds under Chapter 162, Property Code, must be prosecuted in the county where the construction project is located.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1275 (H.B. 2294), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Code of Criminal Procedure, Art/Sec 13.30 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(9), eff. September 1, 2007.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.34. CERTAIN OFFENSES COMMITTED AGAINST A CHILD COMMITTED TO THE TEXAS JUVENILE JUSTICE DEPARTMENT. An offense described by Article 104.003(a) committed by an employee or officer of the Texas Juvenile Justice Department or a person providing services under a contract with the department against a child committed to the department may be prosecuted in:

(1) any county in which an element of the offense occurred; or

(2) Travis County.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 947 (H.B. 3316), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1187 (H.B. 3689), Sec. 4.001, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.35. MONEY LAUNDERING. Money laundering may be prosecuted in the county in which the offense was committed as provided by Article 13.18 or, if the prosecution is based on a criminal offense classified as a felony under the Tax Code, in any county in which venue is proper under the Tax Code for the offense.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 68 (S.B. 934), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.36. STALKING. The offense of stalking may be prosecuted in any county in which an element of the offense occurred.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 591 (S.B. 82), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.37. OBSTRUCTION OR RETALIATION. An offense under Section 36.06(a)(1), Penal Code, may be prosecuted in any county in which:

(1) the harm occurs; or

(2) the threat to do harm originated or was received.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 328 (H.B. 268), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.38. VENUE FOR PROTECTIVE ORDER OFFENSES.

The venue for an offense under Section 25.07 or 25.072, Penal Code, is in the county in which the order was issued or, without regard to the identity or location of the court that issued the protective order, in the county in which the offense was committed.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 614, Sec. 29, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 739, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 14.16, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 96 (S.B. 743), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Transferred and redesignated from Code of Criminal Procedure, Art/Sec 5.07 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 4.001, eff. September 1, 2019.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of article effective until January 01, 2025

Art. 13.40. FALSE REPORT TO INDUCE EMERGENCY RESPONSE. An offense under Section 42.0601, Penal Code, may be prosecuted in any county in which:

(1) the defendant resides;

(2) the false report was made; or

(3) a law enforcement agency or other emergency responder responded to the false report.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 945 (S.B. 1056), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 3.001(6), eff. January 1, 2025.